District of Columbia statutes.
3-1202.21

Board of Veterinary Medicine.

(a)

There is established a Board of Veterinary Medicine to consist of 5 members appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council.

(b)

The Board shall regulate the practices of veterinarians, veterinary technicians, and veterinary euthanasia technicians in the District of Columbia, and shall advise the Mayor with respect to the regulation of veterinary facilities.

(c)

Of the members of the Board, 3 shall be licensed veterinarians, one shall be a veterinary technician, and one shall be a consumer.

(d)

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, members of the Board shall be appointed for terms of 3 years.

(e)

The members of the Board of Veterinary Examiners serving on March 26, 2014, shall become members of the Board of Veterinary Medicine and shall continue to serve on the Board of Veterinary Medicine for the remainder of their terms.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 221
as added Mar. 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 102(i), 61 DCR 1184
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-96 added this section.
Section 401(b) of D.C. Law 20-96 provided that rules promulgated pursuant to Chapter 5 of this title shall remain in effect until the Mayor promulgates rules to implement this subchapter.